Utah statutes.
63G-6-413.   Determination of nonresponsibility of bidder.
A written determination of nonresponsibility of a bidder or offeror shall be
made in accordance with rules and regulations.  The unreasonable failure of a
bidder or offeror to promptly supply information in connection with an inquiry
with respect to responsibility may be grounds for a determination of
nonresponsibility with respect to the bidder or offeror.  Information
furnished by a bidder or offeror pursuant to this section shall not be
disclosed outside of the purchasing division or the purchasing agency without
prior written consent by the bidder or offeror.
